Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1522
Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program; established.

The department shall establish the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program to develop and encourage statewide coordination of respite services and to work with community-based private nonprofit or for-profit agencies, public agencies, and interested citizen groups in the establishment of community lifespan respite services programs. The Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program shall:

(1) Provide policy and program development support, including, but not limited to, data collection and outcome measures;

(2) Identify and promote resolution of local and state-level policy concerns;

(3) Provide technical assistance to community lifespan respite services programs;

(4) Develop and distribute respite services information;

(5) Promote the exchange of information and coordination among state and local governments, community lifespan respite services programs, agencies serving individuals unable to care for themselves, families, and respite care advocates to encourage efficient provision of respite services and reduce duplication of effort;

(6) Ensure statewide access to community lifespan respite services programs; and

(7) Monitor and evaluate implementation of community lifespan respite services programs.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 75;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 289.